Maryland, session 2026, HB1345.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Estates and Trusts
14.5–113.
IF PROBABLE CAUSE EXISTS FOR INSTITUTING PROCEEDINGS, A PROVISION IN
A TRUST PURPORTING TO PENALIZE AN INTERESTED PERSON FOR CONTESTING THE
TRUST OR INSTITUTING OTHER PROCEEDINGS RELATING TO THE ESTATE IS VOID.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any cause of action arising before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 1 –